Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 653.370 is amended to read:
653.370. (1) In addition to  any other penalty provided by law, the Commissioner of the Bureau
of Labor and Industries may impose upon any person who violates ORS  653.305 to 653.370, or any
rule adopted by  the Bureau of Labor and Industries under ORS 653.305 to 653.370 or 653.400, a civil
penalty not to exceed [ $1,000] $10,000 for each violation.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 183.482, any petition for review of an order imposing a civil  penalty
under this section  must be filed within 30 days following the date the order upon which the petition
is based is served.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in this section, civil penalties under  this section shall be im-
posed as provided in ORS 183.745.
(4) All sums collected  as penalties pursuant to this section shall be first applied toward re-
imbursement of the costs incurred in determining the violations,  conducting hearings under this
section and assessing  and collecting such penalties. The remainder, if any, of the sums collected as
penalties pursuant to this section shall be paid over  by the commissioner to the Department of State
Lands for the benefit of the Common School Fund of this state. The department shall issue  a receipt
for the money to the commissioner.
[(5)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (1)  of this section, the commissioner may not impose a civil
penalty pursuant to this  section upon any person who provides evidence satisfactory to the commis-
sioner that:]
[(A) The person has paid a civil penalty to the United States Department of Labor  for violation
of the child labor provisions of the federal Fair Labor Standards Act (29 U.S.C. 201 et seq.); and ]
[(B) The civil penalty involved the same factual circumstances at issue before the commissioner. ]
[(b) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, the commissioner shall refund any civil  penalty
previously imposed on and collected from  any person pursuant to this section if the person provides
evidence satisfactory to the commissioner that: ]
[(A) The person has paid a civil penalty to the United States Department of Labor  for violation
of the child labor provisions of the federal Fair Labor Standards Act (29 U.S.C. 201 et seq.); and ]
[(B) The civil penalty involved the same factual circumstances  underlying the commissioner’s im-
position of a civil penalty. ]
Enrolled House Bill 4004 (HB 4004-A) Page 1
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2024 Act applies to violations occurring  before, on or after
the effective date of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2024 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date  on which the 2024
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by House February 14, 2024
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate February 26, 2024
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4004 (HB 4004-A) Page 2